Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8190.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-22-1.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-22 entitled "Estate and
Transfer Taxes — Liability and Computation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-22-1.1. Tax on net estate of decedent.
(a)(1) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 1992, but prior to January
1, 2002, a tax is imposed upon the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent
as a tax upon the right to transfer. The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state death
taxes allowed by 26 U.S.C. § 2011.
(2) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2002, but prior to January 1,
2010, a tax is imposed upon the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent
as a tax upon the right to transfer. The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state death
taxes allowed by 26 U.S.C. § 2011 as it was in effect as of January 1, 2001; provided, however,
that the tax shall be imposed only if the net taxable estate shall exceed six hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars ($675,000). Any scheduled increase in the unified credit provided in 26 U.S.C. §
2010 in effect on January 1, 2001, or thereafter, shall not apply.
(3) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2010, and prior to January 1,
2015, a tax is imposed upon the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent
as a tax upon the right to transfer. The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state death
taxes allowed by 26 U.S.C. § 2011 as it was in effect as of January 1, 2001; provided, however,

that the tax shall be imposed only if the net taxable estate shall exceed eight hundred and fifty
thousand dollars ($850,000); provided, further, beginning on January 1, 2011, and each January 1
thereafter until January 1, 2015, said amount shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the
Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States
Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year; said
adjustment shall be compounded annually and shall be rounded up to the nearest five dollar ($5.00)
increment. Any scheduled increase in the unified credit provided in 26 U.S.C. § 2010 in effect on
January 1, 2003, or thereafter, shall not apply.
(4) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2015, a tax is imposed upon
the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent as a tax upon the right to
transfer. The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state death taxes allowed by 26 U.S.C.
§ 2011, as it was in effect as of January 1, 2001; provided, however, that a Rhode Island credit shall
be allowed against any tax so determined in the amount of sixty-four thousand four hundred
($64,400). Any scheduled increase in the unified credit provided in 26 U.S.C. § 2010 in effect on
January 1, 2003, or thereafter, shall not apply; provided, further, beginning on January 1, 2016, and
each January 1 thereafter, said Rhode Island credit amount under this section shall be adjusted by
the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as
published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of
the prior calendar year; said adjustment shall be compounded annually and shall be rounded up to
the nearest five dollar ($5.00) increment.
(5) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2027, a tax is imposed upon
the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent as a tax upon the right to
transfer. The tax shall be imposed only if the net taxable estate shall exceed five million dollars
($5,000,000). The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state death taxes allowed by 26
U.S.C. § 2011, as it was in effect as of January 1, 2001; provided, however, that a Rhode Island
credit shall be allowed against any tax so determined. Any scheduled increase in the unified credit
provided in 26 U.S.C. § 2010 in effect on January 1, 2003, or thereafter, shall not apply; provided,
further, beginning on January 1, 2028, and each January 1 thereafter, said Rhode Island credit
amount under this section shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price
Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor
Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year; said
adjustment shall be compounded annually and shall be rounded up to the nearest five dollar ($5.00)
increment.
(6) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2029, a tax is imposed upon
LC005779 - Page 2 of 5

the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent as a tax upon the right to
transfer. The tax shall be imposed only if the net taxable estate shall exceed seven million five
hundred thousand dollars ($7,500,000). The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state
death taxes allowed by 26 U.S.C. § 2011, as it was in effect as of January 1, 2001; provided,
however, that a Rhode Island credit shall be allowed against any tax so determined. Any scheduled
increase in the unified credit provided in 26 U.S.C. § 2010 in effect on January 1, 2003, or
thereafter, shall not apply; provided, further, beginning on January 1, 2030, and each January 1
thereafter, said Rhode Island credit amount under this section shall be adjusted by the percentage
of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the
United States Department of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of
the prior calendar year; said adjustment shall be compounded annually and shall be rounded up to
the nearest five dollar ($5.00) increment.
(7) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2031, a tax is imposed upon
the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent as a tax upon the right to
transfer. The tax shall be imposed only if the net taxable estate shall exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000). The tax is a sum equal to the maximum credit for state death taxes allowed by 26
U.S.C. § 2011, as it was in effect as of January 1, 2001; provided, however, that a Rhode Island
credit shall be allowed against any tax so determined. Any scheduled increase in the unified credit
provided in 26 U.S.C. § 2010 in effect on January 1, 2003, or thereafter, shall not apply; provided,
further, beginning on January 1, 2032, and each January 1 thereafter, said Rhode Island credit
amount under this section shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price
Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor
Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year; said
adjustment shall be compounded annually and shall be rounded up to the nearest five dollar ($5.00)
increment.
(8) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2033, there shall be no tax
imposed upon the transfer of the net estate of every resident or nonresident decedent.
(b) If the decedent’s estate contains property having a tax situs not within the state, then
the tax determined by this section is reduced to an amount determined by multiplying the tax by a
fraction whose numerator is the gross estate excluding all property having a tax situs not within the
state at the decedent’s death and whose denominator is the gross estate. In determining the fraction,
no deductions are considered and the gross estate is not reduced by a mortgage or other
indebtedness for which the decedent’s estate is not liable.
(c)(1) The terms “gross taxable estate,” “federal gross estate” or “net taxable estate” used
LC005779 - Page 3 of 5

in this chapter or chapter 23 of this title has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context
in the laws of the United States, unless a different meaning is clearly required by the provisions of
this chapter or chapter 23 of this title. Any reference in this chapter or chapter 23 of this title to the
Internal Revenue Code or other laws of the United States means the Internal Revenue Code of
1954, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.
(2) For decedents whose death occurs on or after January 1, 2002, the terms “gross taxable
estate” “federal gross estate” or “net taxable estate” used in this chapter or chapter 23 of this title
has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the United States, unless
a different meaning is clearly required by the provisions of this chapter or chapter 23 of this title.
Any reference in this chapter or chapter 23 of this title to the Internal Revenue Code or other laws
of the United States means the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., as they were
in effect as of January 1, 2001, unless otherwise provided.
(d) All values are as finally determined for federal estate tax purposes.
(e) Property has a tax situs within the state of Rhode Island:
(1) If it is real estate or tangible personal property and has actual situs within the state of
Rhode Island; or
(2) If it is intangible personal property and the decedent was a resident.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005779
========
LC005779 - Page 4 of 5